Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1304
State highways; federal aid; state assents.

The legislative assent required by section 1 of the Act of Congress approved July 11, 1916, Public Law 156, entitled An Act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in the construction of rural post roads, and for other purposes, is hereby given. The Legislature likewise assents to the Congressional Federal Aid Acts, Federal Highway Acts, and Federal Aid Highway Acts approved subsequent to July 11, 1916. In the absence of contrary legislative action regarding the assent hereby given, the Legislature shall be deemed to have given a continuing assent to subsequent acts, rules, and regulations which either amend or supplement the above-mentioned acts or otherwise provide funds for the same or similar purposes.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 4, p. 419.